Arkansas, session 2025, HB1980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Technology and Energy for Sustainable Logistics Act (TESLA)".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-38-101(2), concerning the definition of
critical infrastructure with respect to damage or destruction of property, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) “Critical infrastructure” means any of the following
facilities that are either completely enclosed by a fence or other physical
barrier that is designed to exclude persons without permission to be in the
facility or otherwise is clearly marked with signs that are reasonably likely
to be seen by another person that indicate entry or unauthorized access or
*CEB300*
04-07-2025 11:13:22 CEB300

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1980
use is limited or restricted or otherwise forbidden without facility
authorization:
(A) A chemical or rubber manufacturing facility;
(B) A water intake structure, water treatment facility,
wastewater facility, drainage facility, water management facility, or any
similar water or sewage treatment system and the water or sewage treatment
system's piping;
(C) A food processing or manufacturing facility;
(D) A natural gas company facility, an underground gas
storage facility, or interstate natural gas pipeline, including without
limitation:
(i) A pipeline interconnection;
(ii) A natural gas compressor station and associated
facility;
(iii) A city gate or town border station;
(iv) A metering station;
(v) Aboveground piping;
(vi) A regulator station;
(vii) A valve site;
(viii) A delivery station; and
(ix) Fabricated assembly and any part of a natural
gas storage facility involved in the gathering, storage, transmission, or
distribution of gas;
(E) Wireline or wireless telecommunications
infrastructure, including telecommunications towers, telephone poles,
telephone lines, and fiber optic lines;
(F) A port, trucking terminal, or other freight
transportation facility;
(G) A gas processing plant, including a gas processing
plant used in the processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas or
natural gas liquids;
(H) A crude oil or refined products storage and
distribution facility, including without limitation:
(i) A valve site;
(ii) A pipeline interconnection;
(iii) A pump station;
04-07-2025 11:13:22 CEB300

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1980
(iv) A metering station;
(v) A belowground or aboveground pipeline or piping;
(vi) A truck loading or off-loading facility; and
(vii) An aboveground portion of a well, well pad, or
production operation;
(I) A laydown area or construction site for pipe and other
equipment intended for use on an interstate or intrastate natural gas or
crude oil pipeline;
(J) A portion of an oil, gas, hazardous liquid, or
chemical pipeline, tank, or other storage facility that is aboveground;
(K) A video service network and broadband infrastructure,
including without limitation:
(i) Associated buildings and facilities;
(ii) Video service headends, towers, utility poles,
and utility lines; and
(iii) Fiber optic lines;
(L) A mining operation, including any processing
equipment, batching operation, or support facility for that mining operation;
(M) A facility installed in a public right-of-way on a
utility pole or in a conduit that is aboveground and concerns a video service
network or broadband or wireless telecommunications infrastructure;
(N) Railroad property; and
(O) Property owned by and considered an electronic asset
of any of the following:
(i) An electric utility;
(ii) An electric cooperative;
(iii) A municipal electric utility;
(iv) A natural gas company that is a public utility;
(v) A telephone company that is a public utility; or
(vi) A video service provider, including a cable
operator; and
(P) An electric vehicle charging station;

/s/Gazaway


04-07-2025 11:13:22 CEB300